Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 3. Contractors

§ 39-16-301.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Contractor” means any general or prime contractor or subcontractor;

“General or prime contractor” means:

Any person who agrees with the owner or lessee of real property in this state to perform services or furnish materials and services for the construction, alteration, improvement or repair of real property in this state; or

Any person who acts in behalf of the owner or lessee of real property in this state to arrange for the furnishing of services or the furnishing of materials and services for the construction, alteration, improvement or repair of real property in this state; or

Any person who owns or leases real property in this state for the purpose of developing that property and in the development thereof alters or makes improvements to the property or contracts for the alteration or improvement of the property.

“Nonresident general or prime contractor” means any general or prime contractor who has not been a bona fide resident of the state of Wyoming for at least one (1) year prior to bidding upon a contract;

“Nonresident subcontractor” means any subcontractor who has not been a bona fide resident of the state of Wyoming for at least one (1) year prior to bidding upon a contract;

“Sales tax” means the excise tax imposed by the Selective Sales Tax Act of 1937;

“Subcontractor” means any person who agrees with another contractor to perform any part of that contractor’s obligation for furnishing services or furnishing materials and services for the construction, alteration, improvement or repair of real property in this state;

“Surety bond” means a bond or undertaking executed by a surety company authorized to do business in the state;

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 186, § 2.

“Use tax” means the excise tax imposed by the Use Tax Act of 1937.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2019 ch. 186, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, repealed (a)(viii), which read: "`This article' means W.S.

39-16-301

through

39-16-311

."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

Applied

in

Sublette County School Dist. No. 1 v. State Bd. of Equalization, 770 P.2d 218,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1989).

Quoted

in

State v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 891 P.2d 68,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 39-16-302.
Administration.

There are no specific applicable provisions for administration for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-16-303.
Imposition.

Taxable event. There are no specific applicable provisions for taxable event for this article.

Taxpayer. The following shall apply:

Any contractor who furnishes tangible personal property under contract or in the development of real property is the consumer or user of the tangible personal property within the meaning of the use tax laws of Wyoming;

Any subcontractor who contracts with a general or prime contractor is liable for sales taxes as a general or prime contractor. The general or prime contractor shall withhold three percent (3%), plus the increased rate under W.S. 39-15-104(b) if the tax under that section is in effect, of the payments due a nonresident subcontractor arising out of the contract entered into between both contractors. The contractor shall withhold the payments until the subcontractor furnishes him with a certificate issued by the department showing all sales taxes accruing by reason of the contract between them have been paid. The department may demand the withholdings at any time to satisfy the sales tax liability of the subcontractor and any balance shall be released by the department to him. If a contractor fails to withhold payments or refuses to remit them upon demand by the department he is liable for any sales taxes due the state by the nonresident subcontractor. This paragraph shall not apply to any subcontractor hired to provide labor only to alter, construct, improve or repair real property;

To secure payment of use taxes by nonresident prime contractors, each nonresident contractor shall file with the department of revenue a surety bond or legal security equal to three percent (3%), plus the increased rate under W.S. 39-16-104(b) if the tax under that section is in effect, of the payments due under the contract or an amount determined by the department. The bond shall be conditioned upon the payment of all use taxes which become due and payable to this state under the contract or in the real property development. This bond requirement does not apply for a nonresident contractor who has furnished a surety bond as provided by W.S. 39-16-306(b)(v);

Any nonresident prime contractor and any resident prime contractor who hires a nonresident subcontractor shall register any project with the department of revenue not more than fifteen (15) days following the start of a project pursuant to a contract. The nonresident prime contractor shall provide a properly executed bond as required by paragraph (iii) of this subsection, or a cash deposit of not less than four percent (4%) of the total payments due under the contract. The cash deposit shall be refunded to the contractor upon the department’s receipt of a properly executed surety bond or upon satisfactory completion of the project. Failure to register with the department within the time period required by this paragraph shall result in a penalty assessment of one percent (1%) of the total payments due under the contract.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 48, §§ 4, 5; 2013 ch. 150, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “not more than fifteen (15) days” for “not less than fifteen (15) days” in (b)(iv).

§ 39-16-304.
Taxation rate.

There are no specific applicable provisions for taxation rate for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-16-305.
Exemptions.

There are no specific applicable provisions for exemptions for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-16-306.
Licenses; permits; bonding.

Licenses and permits. There are no specific applicable provisions for licenses and permits for this article.

Bonding. The following shall apply:

To secure payment of use taxes by nonresident prime contractors, each nonresident contractor shall file with the department of revenue a surety bond or legal security equal to three percent (3%), plus the increased rate under W.S. 39-16-104(b) if the tax under that section is in effect, of the payments due under the contract or an amount determined by the department. The bond shall be conditioned upon the payment of all use taxes which become due and payable to this state under the contract or in the real property development. This bond requirement does not apply for a nonresident contractor who has furnished a surety bond as provided by paragraph (v) of this subsection;

Any person a party to or performing work on a contract under this section may be enjoined from commencing or continuing any work until an approved bond has been filed with the department. Such an action shall be brought in the name of the state by the attorney general or by a district attorney. The state is not required to post security in seeking a restraining order or preliminary injunction under this section;

In lieu of filing the bond or security required under paragraph (i) of this subsection, a nonresident contractor may file and maintain with the department a surety bond or legal security in the amount of one million dollars ($1,000,000.00). The bond shall be conditioned upon the payment of all use taxes which become due and payable to this state under any of the contractor’s contracts or in any of the contractor’s real property developments in this state. A nonresident contractor electing to file a bond or security under this subsection shall maintain it until he is no longer required to file any bond or security under this article or until a bond or security is filed under paragraph (i) of this subsection;

If a nonresident subcontractor contracts with a general or prime contractor and posts with the department a surety bond deemed sufficient by the department conditioned upon payment when due of all use taxes in the performance of the contract, the withholding provisions of W.S. 39-16-303(b)(ii) do not apply;

Whenever a nonresident general or prime contractor or nonresident subcontractor furnishes a surety bond for the faithful performance of his contract or subcontract there is imposed an additional obligation upon the surety company to the state of Wyoming and the department as its agent that the nonresident contractor shall pay all use taxes which become due in the performance of the contract. In the case of a nonresident general or prime contractor this additional obligation includes liability to pay the department all use taxes which have not been paid to a licensed vendor or the department by the nonresident contractor. The nonresident general or prime contractor or his surety company is authorized to recover from the nonresident subcontractor the amount of use taxes accruing with respect to purchases made by the nonresident subcontractor which were paid to the department by the nonresident contractor or the surety company, or an amount equal to the use taxes so paid by the nonresident contractor may be withheld from payments made under the contract. The liability of the surety company under this section is limited to three percent (3%), plus the increased rate under W.S. 39-16-104(b) if the tax under that section is in effect, of the contract price;

Six (6) months after the completion of the contract and the acceptance of the work and services performed, the additional obligation upon the surety company ceases unless written notice of unpaid use taxes is given the surety company by the department.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Printing press installed in leased building by publishing companynot subject to use tax. —

Where a newspaper publishing company purchased a printing press and installed it in a building leased by the newspaper publishing company, the printing press was not subject to a use tax, since the newspaper publishing company was not a contractor making improvements to real estate. State Bd. of Equalization v. Cheyenne Newspapers, 611 P.2d 805,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1980).

Supplier who installs materials liable for tax. —

If a “contractor”, as defined by § 39-6-601(a)(ii) [now § 39-16-301(a)(ii)], or a “subcontractor”, as defined by § 39-6-603 [now § 39-16-301(a)(vi)], sells to a tax-exempt institution and later installs those materials, then this section imposes tax liability. State v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 891 P.2d 68,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1995).

Tax owed by federal nonresident contractor recoverable fromsurety in state court. —

The federal Miller Act (40 USCS § 270a) requires a federal contractor to post a payment bond and mandates that every suit instituted under the act “shall be brought … in the United States District Court … and not elsewhere.” An action under this section, however, is quite simply not a suit on the bond, nor is the action based directly on the bond, and it is not a suit seeking recovery out of the bond, but rather, it is a suit to enforce an independent statutory obligation placed on all those who act as sureties on performance bonds for any nonresident prime contractor, a tax obligation squarely within the permissible parameters of federal statutory and constitutional law. United Pac. Ins. Co. v. Wyoming Excise Tax Div., Dep't of Revenue & Taxation, 713 P.2d 217,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 456

(Wyo. 1986).

Applied

in

M & B Drilling & Constr. Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 706 P.2d 243,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 560

(Wyo. 1985); United Pac. Ins. Co. v. Wyoming Excise Tax Div., 713 P.2d 217,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 456

(Wyo. 1986); Sublette County School Dist. No. 1 v. State Bd. of Equalization, 770 P.2d 218,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1989); Memorial Hosp. v. Department of Revenue & Taxation, 805 P.2d 276,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1991).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sales and use taxes on leased tangible personal property, 2 ALR4th 859.

Liability of surety on private bond for punitive damages, 2 ALR4th 1254.

§ 39-16-307.
Compliance; collection procedures.

There are no specific applicable provisions for compliance and collection procedures for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-16-308.
Enforcement.

There are no specific applicable provisions for enforcement for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-16-309.
Taxpayer remedies.

There are no specific applicable provisions for taxpayer remedies for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-16-310.
Statute of limitations.

There are no specific applicable provisions for a general statute of limitations for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-16-311.
Distribution.

There are no specific applicable provisions for distribution for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.